Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 328.23, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 328.23. A. The President of the Board, upon


verification that a person meets the requirements provided for in


this section and any other requirements provided for in the State


Dental Act, may issue an emergency temporary license to practice


dentistry for thirty (30) days. A temporary license may be extended


but shall not exceed ninety (90) days or the next available


regularly scheduled Board meeting.


B. The President of the Board, upon verification that a person


meets the requirements provided for in the State Dental Act, may

Req. No. 3156 Page 1


issue an emergency temporary license to practice dental hygiene,


which shall expire as of the date of the next dental hygiene


clinical examination in Oklahoma, as required by the Board.


C. An active duty military spouse residing with the active duty


member having met the requirements for licensure shall be eligible


for a temporary license.


D. Any applicant requesting an emergency temporary license


shall submit a letter explaining the exigent circumstances along


with all application materials. The determination of whether or not


to grant the emergency temporary license based upon the exigent


circumstances shall be at the sole discretion of the President or


acting President of the Board.


E. A holder of a temporary license to practice dentistry or


dental hygiene shall have the same rights and privileges and be


governed by the State Dental Act and the rules of the Board in the


same manner as a holder of a permanent license to practice dentistry


and dental hygiene.


F. The President of the Board may authorize patient treatment


and care by individuals taking the Commission on Dental Competency


Assessments (CDCA) or the Western Regional Examining Board exam, or


other regional exams as approved by the Board, American Board of


Dental Examiners (ADEX) exam in order for such individuals to


complete criteria related to Board examinations. The Board may



Req. No. 3156 Page 2


authorize specialty examinations to be given throughout the year as


needed.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 328.29a, as


last amended by Section 11, Chapter 273, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 328.29a), is amended to read as follows:


Section 328.29a. A. The following acts or occurrences by a


dental assistant shall constitute grounds for which the penalties


specified in Section 328.44a of this title may be imposed by the


Board of Dentistry or be the basis for denying a new applicant any


license or permit issued by the Board:


1. Any of the causes now existing in the laws of this state;


2. A violation of the provisions of the State Dental Act; or


3. A violation of the rules of the Board promulgated pursuant


to the State Dental Act.


B. The Board shall also have the power to act upon a petition


by a dental assistant for reinstatement to good standing. The Board


shall keep a record of the evidence and proceedings in all matters


involving the revocation or suspension of a permit, censure or


probation of a dental assistant. The Board shall make findings of


fact and a decision thereon. Notification of the licensee or permit


holder shall occur pursuant to Section 328.21 of this title.


C. The decision shall be final unless the dental assistant


appeals the decision as provided by the State Dental Act.



Req. No. 3156 Page 3


D. The Board shall have power to revoke or suspend the permit,


censure, or place on probation a dental assistant for a violation of


one or more of the following:


1. Pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or being convicted


of, a felony crime that substantially relates to the occupation of a


dental assistant and poses a reasonable threat to public safety, or


a violation of federal or state controlled dangerous substances


laws;


2. Presenting to the Board a false application or documentation


for a permit;


3. Being, by reason of persistent inebriety or addiction to


drugs, incompetent to continue to function as a dental assistant;


4. Functioning outside the general direct or direct visual


supervision of a dentist for a procedure as required by the State


Dental Act;


5. Performing any function prohibited by Chapter 15 of the


Oklahoma Administrative Code or any violation that would be a


violation for a dentist or hygienist under Section 328.32 or 328.33


of this title, or any other duty not assignable to a dental


assistant; or


6. Failure to secure an annual registration as specified in


Section 328.41 of this title.


E. The Board’s review panel, as set forth in Section 328.43a of


this title, upon concurrence with the president of the Board, may

Req. No. 3156 Page 4


determine that an emergency exists to temporarily suspend the permit


of a dental assistant if the panel finds that public health, safety


or welfare imperatively requires emergency action. The panel may


conduct a hearing pursuant to Section 314 of Title 75 of the


Oklahoma Statutes for the temporary suspension.


F. As used in this section:


1. “Substantially relates” means the nature of criminal conduct


for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the


fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or


responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and


2. “Poses a reasonable threat” means the nature of criminal


conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat


of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability


to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3156 DC 1/14/2026 11:06:10 PM















Req. No. 3156 Page 5